Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2040
Licenses issued under prior law; department review; expiration; permits issued under act; expiration.

The department shall review all licenses for solid waste management facilities which were issued under the Environmental Protection Act prior to July 15, 1992, and which expire after October 1, 1993, to determine whether the licensee is in compliance with the requirements of the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act and the rules and regulations adopted by the council.

The department may require such licensee to furnish written documentation evidencing compliance. If the department determines that the licensee is not in compliance with the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act and the rules and regulations adopted by the council, the department may issue an amended permit as necessary to bring the licensee into compliance with these provisions.

All licenses for solid waste management facilities issued under the Environmental Protection Act prior to July 15, 1992, shall expire at the stated date of expiration if such expiration date is before October 1, 1993, except that the department may extend such licenses to continue until October 1, 1993, if it finds that the facility remains in compliance with the Environmental Protection Act and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder by the council prior to July 15, 1992.

Permits for solid waste processing facilities, as defined in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council, issued pursuant to the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act shall expire not more than ten years following the date of issuance, as determined by the department. Permits may be renewed only if the department determines, upon application, that the permitholder is in compliance with all requirements of the act.

Permits for solid waste disposal areas, as defined in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council, issued pursuant to the act shall expire not more than five years following the date of issuance as determined by the department. Permits may be renewed only if the department determines, upon application, that the permitholder is in compliance with all requirements of the act.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 40;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 72;

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 7.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.